North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108. Social Services. [Repealed]
§§ 108-1 through 108-123.
[Repealed]

Repealed and recodified by Session Laws 1981, c. 275, ss. 1 to 3.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1981, c. 275, s. 1 repealed Chapter 108. Pursuant to ss. 2 and 3 of the act, Parts 1A, 2 and 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 108 were recodified as Chapters 131C and 131D, and Article 6 of Chapter 108 was recodified as Part 26 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B (now repealed). The act became effective October 1, 1981.